Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-304
Irregular tracts of land; survey.

It shall be the duty of the county board of each organized county in the State of Nebraska to cause to be surveyed, by a competent surveyor, all irregular subdivided tracts or lots of land, other than regular government subdivisions, and cause the same to be platted on a scale of not less than ten inches to the mile; Provided, however, where any county has in its possession the correct field notes of any such tract or lot of land, a new survey shall not be necessary, but such tracts may be mapped from such field notes.

Laws 1879, § 142, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 1084;

C.S.1922, § 1009;

C.S.1929, § 26-701;

R.S.1943, § 23-304.

Designation of an irregular tract as a certain numbered tax lot meets all requirements for describing irregular tracts, where plat is prepared and filed hereunder showing descriptions corresponding to the tax lot. City of Scottsbluff v. Kennedy, 141 Neb. 728, 4 N.W.2d 878 (1942).